Louisiana, session 2026, SB232.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 13:10.3(D) and 103 are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 13:10.3(D)(3) and (4) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§10.3. Judges' Supplemental Compensation Fund; creation; sources of funds
* * *
D. After making provisions for necessary and associated administrative
expenses, including those invoiced by the judicial administrator for services
actually provided, the board shall authorize the judicial administrator to set aside
and transmit monthly an amount to provide the additional employer's retirement
contribution due by the state on the supplemental compensation to the relevant State
Employees' Retirement System on behalf of the judges who are members of the a
public retirement system. The board, through the judicial administrator, shall then
distribute the proceeds from the fund monthly, as follows:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 232 ENROLLED
(3) The provisions of this Subsection shall apply only to a justice, judge,
or commissioner serving in an office listed in Paragraph (D)(1) or (2) who has
either served in any of those offices on or before December 31, 2026, or has
served in any of those offices for at least three years after December 31, 2026.
(4) Any savings as a result of the provisions of this Subsection shall not
be used to increase the amounts provided for under this Subsection to any
amount higher than the amount paid during Fiscal Year 2025-26 and shall be
retained to provide a reserve to maintain the stability of the fund. The reserve
may be used during any reduction in the fund's receipts to maintain stability in
payments.
* * *
§103. Expenses of chief justice and associate justices of the supreme court;
reimbursement
A. The chief justice and each associate justice of the supreme court shall be
reimbursed for reasonable housing and other otherwise unreimbursed
unvouchered expenses incurred while on official duty, payable out of the self-
generated funds provided for in R.S. 13:124 in amounts not to exceed the amounts
allocated under the authority of this Section as of May 1, 1989.
B. The allowance payable from self-generated funds as provided for in
this Section shall be adjusted for inflation on January first of each year by the
change in the consumer price index - U.S. city average for all urban consumers
(CPI-U) as prepared by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Labor Statistics, applied annually, and shall reflect the change, if any, since the
amount was last modified, provided that any adjustment in a monthly amount
shall be made only in whole increments of one hundred dollars.
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 232 ENROLLED
Section 3. Section 2 of this Act shall take effect and become operative if and when
the Act which originated as House Bill No. 398 of this 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is enacted and becomes effective.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.